Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB629.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 141 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Leave of absence period":
1. Means the period, not exceeding the hourly equivalent of forty (40)
hours for each living donor, during which an employer provides a
paid leave of absence to a living donor for the specific purpose of
organ or bone marrow donation; and
2. Does not include a period during which a living donor utilizes any
annual or sick leave that the living donor has been granted by the
employer;
(b) "Living donor" means an employee who is a Kentucky resident and is
absent from work solely for the purpose of donating an organ or bone
marrow; and
(c) "Organ" means any part of a human intestine, kidney, liver, lung,
pancreas, or uterus.
(2) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2027, but before January 1,
2031, there is hereby established a nonrefundable employers' organ and bone
Page 1 of 12
XXXX 2/6/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2077
marrow donation tax credit.
(3) (a) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, every employer
providing a leave of absence period to a living donor shall qualify for the
employers' organ and bone marrow donation tax credit. An employer that
qualifies for the credit may apply that credit against:
1. Taxes on insurance companies imposed by KRS 136.320, 136.330,
136.340, 136.350, 136.370, 136.390, and 304.3-270; or
2. Taxes imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and 141.0401.
(b) For the credit against the taxes imposed by KRS 141.020 or 141.040 and
141.0401, the ordering of the credits shall be as provided in Section 2 of this
Act.
(c) An insurance company claiming a credit against the insurance premium tax
is not required to pay additional retaliatory tax levied pursuant to KRS
304.3-270.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section, the credit shall not be applied
against any tax withheld by an employer from an employee pursuant to KRS
141.310.
(5) (a) The credit shall be equal to the sum of the:
1. Amount of employee compensation paid during the leave of absence
period; and
2. Cost of temporary replacement help, if any, during the leave of
absence period.
(b) If the living donor on a paid leave of absence period is employed by an
employer organized as a pass-through entity, the credit shall be distributed
to each partner, member, or shareholder based on the partner's, member's,
or shareholder's distributive share of the income of the pass-through entity.
(6) Any amount of credit not used for the taxable year during which a leave of
Page 2 of 12
XXXX 2/6/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2077
absence period was granted may be carried forward for no more than three (3)
taxable years. Credits shall not be carried back for use in preceding taxable years.
(7) The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A as necessary to administer this section.
(8) Claims for credit shall be documented on the applicable tax return of the
employer in the manner specified by the department, including but not limited to
the following information:
(a) The employer's name, tax identification number, and address;
(b) Sufficient proof of the length and purpose of the living donor's leave of
absence period, including written verification by a physician or similar
documentation, which the department may require at its discretion; and
(c) The amount of the living donor's compensation and costs associated with
any temporary replacement help and proof that temporary replacement help
was needed because of the living donor's leave of absence period.
(9) In order to evaluate the effectiveness of the credit, the department shall report the
following information to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue on or before December
1, 2028, and on or before each December 1 thereafter, as long as the credit is
claimed on a tax return:
(a) The number of returns claiming the employers' organ and bone marrow
donation credit;
(b) The total amount of credit claimed for each taxable year; and
(c) 1. In the case of all taxpayers other than corporations, based on ranges
of adjusted gross income of no larger than five thousand dollars
($5,000) for the taxable year, the total amount of tax credits claimed
and the number of returns claiming a tax credit for each adjusted
gross income range; and
Page 3 of 12
XXXX 2/6/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2077
2. In the case of all corporations, based on ranges of net income no
larger than fifty thousand ($50,000) for the taxable year, the total
amount of tax credit claimed and the number of returns claiming a tax
credit for each net income range.
Section 2. KRS 141.0205 is amended to read as follows:
If a taxpayer is entitled to more than one (1) of the tax credits allowed against the tax
imposed by KRS 141.020, 141.040, and 141.0401, the priority of application and use of
the credits shall be determined as follows:
(1) The nonrefundable business incentive credits against the tax imposed by KRS
141.020 shall be taken in the following order:
(a) The limited liability entity tax credit permitted by KRS 141.0401;
(b) The economic development credits computed under KRS 141.347, 141.381,
141.384, 141.3841, 141.400, 141.403, 141.407, 141.415, 154.12-207, and
154.12-2088;
(c) The qualified farming operation credit permitted by KRS 141.412;
(d) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.397(1)(a);
(e) The health insurance credit permitted by KRS 141.062;
(f) The tax paid to other states credit permitted by KRS 141.070;
(g) The credit for hiring the unemployed permitted by KRS 141.065;
(h) The recycling or composting equipment credit permitted by KRS 141.390;
(i) The [tax ]credit for cash contributions in investment funds permitted by KRS
154.20-263 in effect prior to July 15, 2002, and the credit permitted by KRS
154.20-258;
(j) The research facilities credit permitted by KRS 141.395;
(k) The employer High School Equivalency Diploma program incentive credit
permitted under KRS 151B.402;
(l) The voluntary environmental remediation credit permitted by KRS 141.418;
Page 4 of 12
XXXX 2/6/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2077
(m) The biodiesel and renewable diesel credit permitted by KRS 141.423;
(n) The clean coal incentive credit permitted by KRS 141.428;
(o) The ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4242;
(p) The cellulosic ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4244;
(q) The energy efficiency credits permitted by KRS 141.436;
(r) The railroad maintenance and improvement credit permitted by KRS 141.385;
(s) The Endow Kentucky credit permitted by KRS 141.438;
(t) The New Markets Development Program credit permitted by KRS 141.434;
(u) The distilled spirits credit permitted by KRS 141.389;
(v) The angel investor credit permitted by KRS 141.396;
(w) The film industry credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications approved
on or after April 27, 2018, but before January 1, 2022;
(x) The inventory credit permitted by KRS 141.408;
(y) The renewable chemical production credit permitted by KRS 141.4231;[ and]
(z) The qualified broadband investment [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.391;
and
(aa) The employers' organ and bone marrow donation credit permitted by
Section 1 of this Act;
(2) After the application of the nonrefundable credits in subsection (1) of this section,
the nonrefundable personal tax credits against the tax imposed by KRS 141.020
shall be taken in the following order:
(a) The individual credits permitted by KRS 141.020(3);
(b) The credit permitted by KRS 141.066;
(c) The tuition credit permitted by KRS 141.069;
(d) The household and dependent care credit permitted by KRS 141.067;
(e) The income gap credit permitted by KRS 141.066; and
(f) The Education Opportunity Account Program [tax ]credit permitted by KRS
Page 5 of 12
XXXX 2/6/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2077
141.522;
(3) After the application of the nonrefundable credits provided for in subsection (2) of
this section, the refundable credits against the tax imposed by KRS 141.020 shall be
taken in the following order:
(a) The individual withholding tax credit permitted by KRS 141.350;
(b) The individual estimated tax payment credit permitted by KRS 141.305;
(c) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.3961, 171.3963, and
171.397(1)(b);
(d) The film industry [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications
approved prior to April 27, 2018, or on or after January 1, 2022;
(e) The development area [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.398;
(f) The decontamination [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.419; and
(g) The pass-through entity tax credit permitted by KRS 141.209;
(4) The nonrefundable credit permitted by KRS 141.0401 shall be applied against the
tax imposed by KRS 141.040;
(5) The following nonrefundable credits shall be applied against the sum of the tax
imposed by KRS 141.040 after subtracting the credit provided for in subsection (4)
of this section, and the tax imposed by KRS 141.0401 in the following order:
(a) The economic development credits computed under KRS 141.347, 141.381,
141.384, 141.3841, 141.400, 141.403, 141.407, 141.415, 154.12-207, and
154.12-2088;
(b) The qualified farming operation credit permitted by KRS 141.412;
(c) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.397(1)(a);
(d) The health insurance credit permitted by KRS 141.062;
(e) The unemployment credit permitted by KRS 141.065;
(f) The recycling or composting equipment credit permitted by KRS 141.390;
(g) The coal conversion credit permitted by KRS 141.041;
Page 6 of 12
XXXX 2/6/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2077
(h) The enterprise zone credit permitted by KRS 154.45-090, for taxable periods
ending prior to January 1, 2008;
(i) The [tax ]credit for cash contributions to investment funds permitted by KRS
154.20-263 in effect prior to July 15, 2002, and the credit permitted by KRS
154.20-258;
(j) The research facilities credit permitted by KRS 141.395;
(k) The employer High School Equivalency Diploma program incentive credit
permitted by KRS 151B.402;
(l) The voluntary environmental remediation credit permitted by KRS 141.418;
(m) The biodiesel and renewable diesel credit permitted by KRS 141.423;
(n) The clean coal incentive credit permitted by KRS 141.428;
(o) The ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4242;
(p) The cellulosic ethanol credit permitted by KRS 141.4244;
(q) The energy efficiency credits permitted by KRS 141.436;
(r) The ENERGY STAR home or ENERGY STAR manufactured home credit
permitted by KRS 141.437;
(s) The railroad maintenance and improvement credit permitted by KRS 141.385;
(t) The railroad expansion credit permitted by KRS 141.386;
(u) The Endow Kentucky credit permitted by KRS 141.438;
(v) The New Markets Development Program credit permitted by KRS 141.434;
(w) The distilled spirits credit permitted by KRS 141.389;
(x) The film industry credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications approved
on or after April 27, 2018, but before January 1, 2022;
(y) The inventory credit permitted by KRS 141.408;
(z) The renewable chemical production [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.4231;
(aa) The Education Opportunity Account Program [tax ]credit permitted by KRS
141.522;[ and]
Page 7 of 12
XXXX 2/6/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2077
(ab) The qualified broadband investment [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.391;
and
(ac) The employers' organ and bone marrow donation credit permitted by
Section 1 of this Act; and
(6) After the application of the nonrefundable credits in subsection (5) of this section,
the refundable credits shall be taken in the following order:
(a) The corporation estimated tax payment credit permitted by KRS 141.044;
(b) The certified rehabilitation credit permitted by KRS 171.3961, 171.3963, and
171.397(1)(b);
(c) The film industry [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.383 for applications
approved prior to April 27, 2018, or on or after January 1, 2022;
(d) The decontamination [tax ]credit permitted by KRS 141.419; and
(e) The pass-through entity tax credit permitted by KRS 141.209.
Section 3. KRS 131.190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) No present or former commissioner or employee of the department, present or
former member of a county board of assessment appeals, present or former property
valuation administrator or employee, present or former secretary or employee of the
Finance and Administration Cabinet, former secretary or employee of the Revenue
Cabinet, or any other person, shall intentionally and without authorization inspect
or divulge any information acquired by him or her of the affairs of any person, or
information regarding the tax schedules, returns, or reports required to be filed with
the department or other proper officer, or any information produced by a hearing or
investigation, insofar as the information may have to do with the affairs of the
person's business.
(2) The prohibition established by subsection (1) of this section shall not extend to:
(a) Information required in prosecutions for making false reports or returns of
property for taxation, or any other infraction of the tax laws;
Page 8 of 12
XXXX 2/6/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2077
(b) Any matter properly entered upon any assessment record, or in any way made
a matter of public record;
(c) Furnishing any taxpayer or his or her properly authorized agent with
information respecting his or her own return;
(d) Testimony provided by the commissioner or any employee of the department
in any court, or the introduction as evidence of returns or reports filed with the
department, in an action for violation of state or federal tax laws or in any
action challenging state or federal tax laws;
(e) Providing an owner of unmined coal, oil or gas reserves, and other mineral or
energy resources assessed under KRS 132.820, or owners of surface land
under which the unmined minerals lie, factual information about the owner's
property derived from third-party returns filed for that owner's property, under
the provisions of KRS 132.820, that is used to determine the owner's
assessment. This information shall be provided to the owner on a confidential
basis, and the owner shall be subject to the penalties provided in KRS
131.990(2). The third-party filer shall be given prior notice of any disclosure
of information to the owner that was provided by the third-party filer;
(f) Providing to a third-party purchaser pursuant to an order entered in a
foreclosure action filed in a court of competent jurisdiction, factual
information related to the owner or lessee of coal, oil, gas reserves, or any
other mineral resources assessed under KRS 132.820. The department may
promulgate an administrative regulation establishing a fee schedule for the
provision of the information described in this paragraph. Any fee imposed
shall not exceed the greater of the actual cost of providing the information or
ten dollars ($10);
(g) Providing information to a licensing agency, the Transportation Cabinet, or
the Kentucky Supreme Court under KRS 131.1817;
Page 9 of 12
XXXX 2/6/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2077
(h) Statistics of gasoline and special fuels gallonage reported to the department
under KRS 138.210 to 138.448;
(i) Providing any utility gross receipts license tax return information that is
necessary to administer the provisions of KRS 160.613 to 160.617 to
applicable school districts on a confidential basis;
(j) Providing documents, data, or other information to a third party pursuant to an
order issued by a court of competent jurisdiction;
(k) Publishing administrative writings on its official website in accordance with
KRS 131.020(1)(b); or
(l) Providing information to the Legislative Research Commission under:
1. KRS 139.519 for purposes of the sales and use tax refund on building
materials used for disaster recovery;
2. KRS 141.436 for purposes of the energy efficiency products credits;
3. KRS 141.437 for purposes of the ENERGY STAR home and the
ENERGY STAR manufactured home credits;
4. KRS 141.383 for purposes of the film industry incentives;
5. KRS 154.26-095 for purposes of the Kentucky industrial revitalization
credit and the job assessment fees;
6. KRS 141.068 for purposes of the Kentucky investment fund;
7. KRS 141.396 for purposes of the angel investor credit;
8. KRS 141.389 for purposes of the distilled spirits credit;
9. KRS 141.408 for purposes of the inventory credit;
10. KRS 141.390 for purposes of the recycling and composting credits;
11. KRS 141.3841 for purposes of the selling farmer credit;
12. KRS 141.4231 for purposes of the renewable chemical production
credit;
13. KRS 141.524 for purposes of the Education Opportunity Account
Page 10 of 12
XXXX 2/6/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2077
Program credit;
14. KRS 141.398 for purposes of the development area credit;
15. KRS 139.516 for purposes of the sales and use tax exemptions for the
commercial mining of cryptocurrency;
16. KRS 141.419 for purposes of the decontamination credit;
17. KRS 141.391 for purposes of the qualified broadband investment credit;
18. KRS 139.499 for purposes of the sales and use tax exemptions for a
qualified data center project;[ and]
19. KRS 139.5325 for purposes of the sales and use tax incentive for a
qualifying attraction; and
20. Section 1 of this Act for purposes of the employers' organ and bone
marrow donation credit.
(3) The commissioner shall make available any information for official use only and on
a confidential basis to the proper officer, agency, board or commission of this state,
any Kentucky county, any Kentucky city, any other state, or the federal
government, under reciprocal agreements whereby the department shall receive
similar or useful information in return.
(4) Access to and inspection of information received from the Internal Revenue Service
is for department use only, and is restricted to tax administration purposes.
Information received from the Internal Revenue Service shall not be made available
to any other agency of state government, or any county, city, or other state, and
shall not be inspected intentionally and without authorization by any present
secretary or employee of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, commissioner or
employee of the department, or any other person.
(5) Statistics of crude oil as reported to the department under the crude oil excise tax
requirements of KRS Chapter 137 and statistics of natural gas production as
reported to the department under the natural resources severance tax requirements
Page 11 of 12
XXXX 2/6/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2077
of KRS Chapter 143A may be made public by the department by release to the
Energy and Environment Cabinet, Department for Natural Resources.
(6) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, beginning with mine-map
submissions for the 1989 tax year, the department may make public or divulge only
those portions of mine maps submitted by taxpayers to the department pursuant to
KRS Chapter 132 for ad valorem tax purposes that depict the boundaries of mined-
out parcel areas. These electronic maps shall not be relied upon to determine actual
boundaries of mined-out parcel areas. Property boundaries contained in mine maps
required under KRS Chapters 350 and 352 shall not be construed to constitute land
surveying or boundary surveys as defined by KRS 322.010 and any administrative
regulations promulgated thereto.
Section 4. Section 1 of this Act may be cited as the Living Organ and Bone
Marrow Donor Assistance Act of 2026.
Page 12 of 12
XXXX 2/6/2026 10:38 AM Jacketed